Louisiana, session 2026, HB999.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:863.1(C)(1)(a) and (I)(1) are hereby amended and reenacted to
read as follows:
§863.1. Evidence of compulsory motor vehicle liability security contained in
vehicle; enforcement; penalty; fees
* * *
C.(1)(a) If the operator of a motor vehicle is unable to show compliance with
the provisions of this Part by displaying the required document when requested to
do so, the motor vehicle shall be impounded and the operator shall be issued a notice
of noncompliance with the provisions of this Part on a physical or electronic form
provided by the department. Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S. 32:852(E), the
notice may be sent by first class mail. A copy of the notice of noncompliance shall
be provided to the towing or storage company and a copy shall be forwarded to the
office of motor vehicles within three calendar days after the notice of noncompliance
was served. The notice of noncompliance shall serve as notice of administrative
hearings rights. In addition, the law enforcement officer shall remove the license
plate from the vehicle if the vehicle is registered in Louisiana. The law enforcement
officer shall deliver the vehicle license plate to the chief of the agency which
employs the officer, or to a person in that agency designated to receive confiscated
license plates. In those cases in which a motor vehicle is not impounded, a copy of
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 999 ENROLLED
the notice of noncompliance shall be attached to the vehicle license plate and both
shall be delivered to the nearest office of motor vehicles within three calendar days
after the notice of noncompliance was served. The provisions of this Paragraph
apply to all motor vehicles operated in this state, including vehicles registered in
another state.
* * *
I.(1) Every owner or lessee of a self-propelled motor vehicle registered in
another state which is involved in a traffic accident or collision in Louisiana shall
provide one of the documents comparable to those listed in Subsection A evidencing
that the motor vehicle is covered by a valid policy of automobile insurance. If the
operator of the motor vehicle is unable to show such proof, a notice of
noncompliance shall be issued. The provisions of this Section, including the
requirements for proof of motor vehicle liability security and the enforcement,
impoundment, and due process procedures established herein, apply to any motor
vehicle registered in another state when operated upon the public highways of this
state.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.